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DTC 38( 1) TransmissionFluidTemperatureSensorCircuit
Malfunction(ATFTemperatureSensorNo. 1)

DTC 38(2) TransmissionFluidTemperatureSensorNo.2Cir-
cuit Malfunction (ATF Temperature Sensor No. 2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The ATF temperature sensor converts fluid temperature into a resistance value which is input into the Engine
& ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

38(1)

Either (a) or (b) is detected for 0.5 sec. or more.
(1−tripdetection logic)
(a)Temp.sensor resistance is less than79 �

(b)After theenginehasbeenoperating for15minutesor
more, the resistanceat the temp.sensor ismore than156k �

SOpenorshort inATF temperaturesensorNo.1circuit
SATFtemperaturesensorNo.1
SEngine&ECTECU

38(2)
DTCisdetected for0.5sec.ormore (1 −tripdetection logic)
ATF temperaturesensor resistance ismore than156k �� after
started engine for 15 minutes or more

SOpen inATFtemperaturesensorNo.2circuit
SATFtemperaturesensorNo.2

SEngineandECTECU

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checktransmissionwire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector from the transmis-
sion.
CHECK:
(a)Measure the resistancebetween terminalsOT+andOT −.
(b) Measure the resistance between terminals OT2+ and

OT2−.
OK:

79 � − 156k �

CHECK:
(a)Measure resistancebetween terminalsOT+andOT − of

the transmission wire connector and body ground.
(b)Measure resistancebetween terminalsOT2+andOT2 −

of the transmission wire connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orhigher

NG Replace the transmission wire (ATF tempera-
ture sensor).

OK
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2 Measure resistance between terminal OIL, OIL2 and E2 of Engine and ECT ECU
connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between terminals OIL and E2.
(b) Measure the resistance between terminals OIL2 and E2.
OK:

79 � − 156 k�
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals OIL, OIL2 and E2 of the
Engine and ECT ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).


